Maryland, session 2025, HB0522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
9–216.
(a) The Department is the central administrative department for:
(1) juvenile intake, detention authorization, community detention,
investigation, probation, protective supervision, predelinquent diversion services, and
aftercare services; and
(2) the State juvenile diagnostic, training, detention, and rehabilitation
institutions.
(b) The Department shall:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0522*

HOUSE BILL 522
(1) develop programs for predelinquent children whose behavior tends to
lead to contact with law enforcement agencies;
(2) promote predelinquent programs, including greater utilization of youth
services bureaus under § 9–234 of this subtitle, that provide services to divert children from
the juvenile justice system;
(3) collaborate with local governments to encourage the use of
predelinquent programs provided by youth services bureaus under § 9–234 of this subtitle
in response to identified community needs; and
(4) provide technical assistance to local governments and youth services
bureaus under § 9–234 of this subtitle to identify alternative funding sources for
predelinquent programs.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT MAY PROVIDE FUNDING FOR UP TO 1 YEAR OF
REHABILITATION SERVICES TO REHABILITATION INSTITUTIONS UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.